New Jersey, session 221, S1649.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person is guilty of the crime of fiscal victimization against a senior citizen or a person with a disability if the person commits, attempts to commit, conspires with another to commit or threatens the immediate commission of a theft offense specified in chapter 20 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes or a violation of N.J.S.2C:21-17 against a senior citizen or a person with a disability. If the victim of an underlying offense is a senior citizen or a person with a disability, the actor shall be strictly liable for the victimization offense and it shall not be a defense that the actor did not know that the victim was a senior citizen or a person with a disability, nor shall it be a defense that the actor believed that the victim was not a senior citizen or a person with a disability, even if the mistaken belief was reasonable. b.    Grading.  Fiscal victimization is a crime of the fourth degree if the underlying offense referred to in subsection a. of this section is a disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense. Otherwise, fiscal victimization is a crime one degree higher than the most serious underlying crime referred to in subsection a. of this section, except that when the underlying crime is a crime of the first degree, fiscal victimization is a first degree crime and the defendant upon conviction thereof may, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:43-6, be sentenced to an ordinary term of imprisonment between 10 years and 30 years, with a presumptive term of 20 years. c.     Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other provision of law to the contrary, a conviction of fiscal victimization shall not merge with a conviction of any of the underlying offenses referred to in subsection a. of this section, nor shall any conviction for the underlying offense merge with a conviction for fiscal victimization.  The court shall impose separate sentences upon a conviction for fiscal victimization and a conviction of any underlying offense. d.    For the purposes of this section: "Person with a disability" means a person who by reason of a pre-existing medically determinable physical or mental impairment is substantially incapable of exercising normal physical or mental power of resistance, and includes, but is not limited to, a person determined disabled pursuant to the federal Social Security Act or any other governmental retirement or benefits program that uses substantially the same criteria for determining eligibility; and "Senior citizen" means a person 60 years of age or older. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.